California statutes. Corporations Code
“Stock split” means the pro rata division, otherwise than by a share dividend, of all the outstanding shares of a class into a greater number of shares of the same class by an amendment to the articles stating the effect on outstanding shares.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 682.)
-------------------------------------------

189.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (b), “subsidiary” of a specified corporation means a corporation shares of which possessing more than 50 percent of the voting power are owned directly or indirectly through one or more subsidiaries by the specified corporation.

(b) For the purpose of Section 703, “subsidiary” of a specified corporation means a corporation shares of which possessing more than 25 percent of the voting power are owned directly or indirectly through one or more subsidiaries as defined in subdivision (a) by the specified corporation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1976, Ch. 641.)
-------------------------------------------

190.

“Surviving corporation” means a corporation into which one or more other corporations or one or more other business entities are merged.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1200, Sec. 18.   Effective September 30, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

190.5.

“Surviving limited partnership” means a limited partnership into which one or more other limited partnerships or one or more corporations are merged.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 543, Sec. 8.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

190.7.

“Surviving other business entity” means an other business entity into which one or more other business entities or one or more corporations are merged.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1200, Sec. 19.   Effective September 30, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

191.

(a) For the purposes of Chapter 21 (commencing with Section 2100), “transact intrastate business” means entering into repeated and successive transactions of its business in this state, other than interstate or foreign commerce.

(b) A foreign corporation shall not be considered to be transacting intrastate business merely because its subsidiary transacts intrastate business or merely because of its status as any one or more of the following:

(1) A shareholder of a domestic corporation.

(2) A shareholder of a foreign corporation transacting intrastate business.

(3) A limited partner of a domestic limited partnership.

(4) A limited partner of a foreign limited partnership transacting intrastate business.

(5) A member or manager of a domestic limited liability company.

(6) A member or manager of a foreign limited liability company transacting intrastate business.

(c) Without excluding other activities that may not constitute transacting intrastate business, a foreign corporation shall not be considered to be transacting intrastate business within the meaning of subdivision (a) solely by reason of carrying on in this state any one or more of the following activities:

(1) Maintaining or
 defending any action or suit or any administrative or arbitration proceeding, or effecting the settlement thereof or the settlement of claims or disputes.

(2) Holding meetings of its board or shareholders or carrying on other activities concerning its internal affairs.

(3) Maintaining bank accounts.

(4) Maintaining offices or agencies for the transfer, exchange, and registration of its securities or depositaries with relation to its securities.

(5) Effecting sales through independent contractors.

(6) Soliciting or procuring orders, whether by mail or through employees or agents or otherwise, where those orders require acceptance outside this state before becoming binding contracts.

(7) Creating evidences of debt or mortgages, liens or security interests on real or personal property.

(8) Conducting an isolated transaction completed within a period of 180 days and not in the course of a number of repeated transactions of like nature.

(d) Without excluding other activities that may not constitute transacting intrastate business, any foreign lending institution, including, but not limited to: any foreign banking corporation, any foreign corporation all of the capital stock of which is owned by one or more foreign banking corporations, any foreign savings and loan association, any foreign insurance company or any foreign corporation or association authorized by its charter to invest in loans secured by real and personal property, whether organized under the laws of the United States or of any other
 state, district or territory of the United States, shall not be considered to be doing, transacting, or engaging in business in this state solely by reason of engaging in any or all of the following activities either on its own behalf or as a trustee of a pension plan, employee profit sharing or retirement plan, testamentary or inter vivos trust, or in any other fiduciary capacity:(1) The acquisition by purchase, by contract to purchase, by making of advance commitments to purchase or by assignment of loans, secured or unsecured, or any interest therein, if those activities are carried on from outside this state by the lending institution.(2) The making by an officer or employee of physical inspections and appraisals of real or personal property securing or proposed to secure any loan, if the officer or employee making any physical inspection or
 appraisal is not a resident of and does not maintain a place of business for that purpose in this state.(3) The ownership of any loans and the enforcement of any loans by trustee’s sale, judicial process, or deed in lieu of foreclosure or otherwise.(4) The modification, renewal, extension, transfer, or sale of loans or the acceptance of additional or substitute security therefor or the full or partial release of the security therefor or the acceptance of substitute or additional obligors thereon, if the activities are carried on from outside this state by the lending institution.(5) The engaging by contractual arrangement of a corporation, firm, or association, qualified to do business in this state, that is not a subsidiary or parent of the lending institution and that
 is not under common management with the lending institution, to make collections and to service loans in any manner whatsoever, including the payment of ground rents, taxes, assessments, insurance, and the like and the making, on behalf of the lending institution, of physical inspections and appraisals of real or personal property securing any loans or proposed to secure any loans, and the performance of any such engagement.(6) The acquisition of title to the real or personal property covered by any mortgage, deed of trust, or other security instrument by trustee’s sale, judicial sale, foreclosure or deed in lieu of foreclosure, or for the purpose of transferring title to any federal agency or instrumentality as the insurer or guarantor of any loan, and the retention of title to any real or personal property so acquired pending the orderly sale or other disposition thereof.(7) The engaging in activities necessary or appropriate to carry out any of the foregoing activities.Nothing contained in this subdivision shall be construed to permit any foreign banking corporation to maintain an office in this state otherwise than as provided by the laws of this state or to limit the powers conferred upon any foreign banking corporation as set forth in the laws of this state or to permit any foreign lending institution to maintain an office in this state except as otherwise permitted under the laws of this state.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 143, Sec. 21.   (SB 251)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

191.1.

“Uncertificated security” means a share (Section 184), or an obligation of the issuer, described in paragraphs (15) and (18) of subdivision (a) of Section 8102 of the Commercial Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 497, Sec. 29.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

192.

“Vacancy” when used with respect to the board means any authorized position of director which is not then filled by a duly elected director, whether caused by death, resignation, removal, change in the authorized number of directors (by the board or the shareholders) or otherwise.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1976, Ch. 641.)
-------------------------------------------

193.

“Verified” means that the statements contained in a certificate or other document are declared to be true of the own knowledge of the persons executing the same in either:

(a) An affidavit signed by them under oath before an officer authorized by the laws of this state or of the place where it is executed to administer oaths, or 

(b) A declaration in writing executed by them “under penalty of perjury” and stating the date and place (whether within or without this state) of execution. 

Any affidavit sworn to
 without this state before a notary public or a judge or clerk of a court of record having an official seal need not be further authenticated.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 682.)
-------------------------------------------

194.

“Vote” includes authorization by written consent, subject to the provisions of subdivision (b) of Section 307 and subdivision (d) of Section 603.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 128, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

194.5.

“Voting power” means the power to vote for the election of directors at the time any determination of voting power is made and does not include the right to vote upon the happening of some condition or event which has not yet occurred. In any case where different classes of shares are entitled to vote as separate classes for different members of the board, the determination of percentage of voting power shall be made on the basis of the percentage of the total number of authorized directors which the shares in question (whether of one or more classes) have the power to elect in an election at which all shares then entitled to vote for the election of any directors are
 voted.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 641.)
-------------------------------------------

194.7.

“Voting shift” means a change, pursuant to or by operation of a provision of the articles, in the relative rights of the holders of one or more classes or series of shares, voting as one or more separate classes or series, to elect one or more directors.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 495, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

195.

“Written” or “in writing” includes facsimile, telegraphic, and other electronic communication when authorized by this code, including an electronic transmission by a corporation that satisfies the requirements of Section 20.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 254, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. Organization and Bylaws [200. - 213.]

200.

(a) One or more natural persons, partnerships, associations or corporations, domestic or foreign, may form a corporation under this division by executing and filing articles of incorporation.

(b) If initial directors are named in the articles, each director named in the articles shall sign and acknowledge the articles; if initial directors are not named in the articles, the articles shall be signed by one or more persons described in subdivision (a) who thereupon are the incorporators of the corporation. 

(c) The corporate existence begins upon the filing of the articles and continues perpetually, unless otherwise expressly provided by law or in the articles.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1223, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

200.5.

(a) An existing business association organized as a trust under the laws of this state or of a foreign jurisdiction may incorporate under this division upon approval by its board of trustees or similar governing body and approval by the affirmative vote of a majority of the outstanding voting shares of beneficial interest (or such greater proportion of the outstanding shares of beneficial interest or the vote of such other classes of shares of beneficial interest as may be specifically required by its declaration of trust or bylaws) and the filing of articles of incorporation with certificate attached pursuant to this chapter.

(b) In addition to the matters required to be set forth in the articles pursuant to Section 202, the articles in the case of an incorporation authorized by subdivision (a) shall set forth that an existing unincorporated association, stating its name, is being incorporated by the filing of the articles.

(c) The articles filed pursuant to this section shall be signed by the president, or any vice president, and the secretary, or any assistant secretary, of the existing association and shall be accompanied by a certificate signed and verified by such officers signing the articles and stating that the incorporation of the association has been approved by the trustees and by the required vote of holders of shares of beneficial interest in accordance with subdivision (a). 

(d) Upon the filing of articles of incorporation
 pursuant to this section, the corporation shall succeed automatically to all of the rights and property of the association being incorporated and shall be subject to all of its debts and liabilities in the same manner as if the corporation had itself incurred them. The incumbent trustees of the association shall constitute the initial directors of the corporation and shall continue in office until the next annual meeting of the shareholders, unless they die, resign or are removed prior thereto. All rights of creditors and all liens upon the property of the association shall be preserved unimpaired. Any action or proceeding pending by or against the association may be prosecuted to judgment, which shall bind the corporation, or the corporation may be proceeded against or substituted in its place.

(e) The filing for record in the office of the county recorder of any county in this state in which any of the real property of the association is
 located of a copy of the articles of incorporation filed pursuant to this section, certified by the Secretary of State, shall evidence record ownership in the corporation of all interests of the association in and to the real property located in that county.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 370.)
-------------------------------------------

201.

(a) The Secretary of State shall not file articles setting forth a name in which “bank,” “ trust,” “trustee,” or related words appear, unless the certificate of approval of the Commissioner of Financial Protection and Innovation is attached thereto. This subdivision does not apply to the articles of any corporation subject to the Banking Law on which is endorsed the approval of the Commissioner of Financial Protection and Innovation.

(b) The name of a corporation shall not be a name that the Secretary of State determines is likely to mislead the public and shall be distinguishable in the records of the Secretary of State from all of the following:

(1) The name of any corporation.

(2) The name of any foreign corporation authorized to transact intrastate business in this state.

(3) Each name that is under reservation pursuant to this title.

(4) The name of a foreign corporation that has registered its name pursuant to Section 2101.

(5) An alternate name of a foreign corporation under subdivision (b) of Section 2106.

(6) A name that will become the record name of a domestic or foreign corporation upon a corporate instrument when there is a delayed effective or file date.

(c) Subject to Section 2106, this section applies to a foreign corporation transacting business in this state or that has applied for a certificate of qualification.

(d) The use by a corporation of a name in violation of this section may be enjoined notwithstanding the filing of its articles by the Secretary of State.

(e) Any applicant may, upon payment of the fee prescribed therefor in Article 3 (commencing with Section 12180) of Chapter 3 of Part 2 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, obtain from the Secretary of State a certificate of reservation of any name not prohibited by subdivision (b), and upon the issuance of the certificate the name stated therein shall be reserved for a period of 60 days. The Secretary of State shall not, however, issue certificates
 reserving the same name for two or more consecutive 60-day periods to the same applicant or for the use or benefit of the same person; nor shall consecutive reservations be made by or for the use or benefit of the same person; of names so similar as to fall within the prohibitions of subdivision (b).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 617, Sec. 6.   (SB 1202)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

201.5.

The Secretary of State shall not file articles in which the business is to be an insurer unless the certificate of the Insurance Commissioner approving the corporate name is attached thereto.

(History: Added by Stats. 1979, Ch. 737.)
-------------------------------------------

201.6.

(a) (1) When an insurer has been approved by the Insurance Commissioner pursuant to Section 709.5 of the Insurance Code to redomesticate to this state, the redomesticating insurer shall file with the Secretary of State articles of incorporation that include a provision setting forth all of the following information:

(A) The name and former jurisdiction of the redomesticating insurer.

(B) The redomesticating insurer’s Secretary of State file number.

(C) A statement that the redomesticating insurer was authorized to effect the redomestication by the laws under which it formerly was organized.

(D) A statement that the redomesticating insurer has approved a plan of redomestication or other instrument as may be required to effect the redomestication to this state pursuant to the laws under which the redomesticating insurer was organized.

(E) A statement that the Insurance Commissioner has approved the redomestication of the insurer to this state.

(2) The Secretary of State shall not file articles of incorporation containing the information required by paragraph (1) unless a copy of the amended certificate of authority, evidencing the approval of the redomestication by the Insurance Commissioner, is attached thereto.

(b) If a redomesticating insurer is qualified to transact business in this state, by virtue of its filing of articles of
 incorporation in this state, the redomesticating insurer shall automatically surrender its right to transact intrastate business.

(c) (1) An insurer that has filed articles of incorporation in this state and has been approved by the Insurance Commissioner pursuant to Section 709.5 of the Insurance Code to redomesticate to another jurisdiction, shall file with the Secretary of State a statement of redomestication, on a form prescribed by the Secretary of State, containing all of the following information:

(A) The name of the redomesticating insurer.

(B) The redomesticating insurer’s Secretary of State file number.

(C) The jurisdiction of the redomesticated insurer.

(D) The name and street
 address of the redomesticated insurer’s agent for service of process.

(E) A statement that the redomesticating insurer is authorized to effect the redomestication under California law and the jurisdiction to which the insurer is redomesticating.

(F) A statement that the redomesticating insurer has complied with the requirements to redomesticate as required by California law and the jurisdiction to which the insurer is redomesticating.

(G) A statement that the Insurance Commissioner has approved the redomestication of the insurer.

(2) The Secretary of State shall not file the statement of redomestication required by paragraph (1) unless a copy of the amended certificate of authority, evidencing the approval of the redomestication by the Insurance
 Commissioner, is attached thereto.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 417, Sec. 2.   (AB 1696)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

201.7.

Upon receipt of a certified copy of the commissioner’s authorization issued pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 11542 or subdivision (a) of Section 4097.11 of the Insurance Code and subject to subdivision (a) of Section 110 of the Corporations Code, the Secretary of State shall accept for filing the certificate of amendment of the articles of incorporation of the domestic mutual insurer certified by the secretary thereof.

Upon receipt of a certified copy of the commissioner’s authorization to file articles of
 incorporation of a mutual holding company and a stock holding company authorized pursuant to conversion proceedings pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 11542 or subdivision (a) of Section 4097.11 of the Insurance Code and subject to subdivision (a) of Section 110 of the Corporations Code, the Secretary of State shall accept for filing the articles of incorporation of the mutual holding company and stock holding company.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 421, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

202.

The articles of incorporation shall set forth:

(a) The name of the corporation; provided, however, that in order for the corporation to be subject to the provisions of this division applicable to a close corporation (Section 158), the name of the corporation must contain the word “corporation,” “incorporated,” or “limited” or an abbreviation of one of such words.

(b) (1) The applicable one of the following statements:

(A) The purpose of the corporation is to engage in any lawful act or activity for which a corporation may be organized under the General
 Corporation Law of California other than the banking business, the trust company business or the practice of a profession permitted to be incorporated by the California Corporations Code; or

(B) The purpose of the corporation is to engage in the profession of ____ (with the insertion of a profession permitted to be incorporated by the California Corporations Code) and any other lawful activities (other than the banking or trust company business) not prohibited to a corporation engaging in such profession by applicable laws and regulations.

(2) In case the corporation is a corporation subject to the Banking Law (Division 1.1 (commencing with Section 1000) of the Financial Code), the articles shall set forth a statement of purpose which is prescribed in the applicable provision of the Banking
 Law.

(3) In case the corporation is a corporation subject to the Insurance Code as an insurer, the articles shall additionally state that the business of the corporation is to be an insurer.

(4) If the corporation is intended to be a “professional corporation” within the meaning of the Moscone-Knox Professional Corporation Act (Part 4 (commencing with Section 13400) of Division 3), the articles shall additionally contain the statement required by Section 13404.

The articles shall not set forth any further or additional statement with respect to the purposes or powers of the corporation, except by way of limitation or except as expressly required by any law of this state other than this division or any federal or other statute or
 regulation (including the Internal Revenue Code and regulations thereunder as a condition of acquiring or maintaining a particular status for tax purposes).

(c) The name and street address in this state of the corporation’s
 initial agent for service of process in accordance with subdivision (b) of Section 1502.

(d) The initial street address of its principal office.

(e) The initial mailing address of the corporation, if different from the initial street address.

(f) If the corporation is authorized to issue only one class of shares, the total number of shares which the corporation is authorized to issue.

(g) If the corporation is authorized to issue more than one class of shares, or if any class of shares is to have two or more series:

(1) The total number of shares of each class the corporation is authorized
 to issue, and the total number of shares of each series which the corporation is authorized to issue or that the board is authorized to fix the number of shares of any such series;

(2) The designation of each class, and the designation of each series or that the board may determine the designation of any such series; and

(3) The rights, preferences, privileges, and restrictions granted to or imposed upon the respective classes or series of shares or the holders thereof, or that the board, within any limits and restrictions stated, may determine or alter the rights, preferences, privileges, and restrictions granted to or imposed upon any wholly unissued class of shares or any wholly unissued series of any class of shares. As to any series the number of shares of which is authorized to be
 fixed by the board, the articles may also authorize the board, within the limits and restrictions stated therein or stated in any resolution or resolutions of the board originally fixing the number of shares constituting any series, to increase or decrease (but not below the number of shares of such series then outstanding) the number of shares of any such series subsequent to the issue of shares of that series. In case the number of shares of any series shall be so decreased, the shares constituting such decrease shall resume the status which they had before the adoption of the resolution originally fixing the number of shares of such series.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 617, Sec. 7.   (SB 1202)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

203.

Except as specified in the articles or in any shareholders’ agreement, no distinction shall exist between classes or series of shares or the holders thereof.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 682.)
-------------------------------------------

203.5.

(a) If the articles include the designation and number of shares of one or more series within a class, the stated number of shares for all series within the class shall not exceed, and may be less than, the stated number of shares for the class.

(b) If so authorized in the articles and if the articles state the number of shares of the class, the articles may be amended by approval of the board alone to increase or decrease (but not below the number of shares of the series then outstanding) the number of shares of a series.

(c) If the articles authorize a class of shares which is stated to be issuable in series, the articles shall include either the designation and number of shares for at least one series within that class or an authorization of common shares.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 919, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

204.

The articles of incorporation may set forth:

(a) Any or all of the following provisions, which shall not be effective unless expressly provided in the articles:

(1) Granting, with or without limitations, the power to levy assessments upon the shares or any class of shares.

(2) Granting to shareholders preemptive rights to subscribe to any or all issues of shares or securities.

(3) Special qualifications of persons who may be shareholders.

(4) A provision limiting the duration of the corporation’s existence to a
 specified date.

(5) A provision requiring, for any or all corporate actions, except as provided in Section 303, subdivision (b) of Section 402.5, subdivision (c) of Section 708, and Section 1900, the vote of a larger proportion or of all of the shares of any class or series, or the vote or quorum for taking action of a larger proportion or of all of the directors, than is otherwise required by this division.

(6) A provision limiting or restricting the business in which the corporation may engage or the powers which the corporation may exercise or both.

(7) A provision conferring upon the holders of any evidences of indebtedness, issued or to be issued by the corporation, the right to vote in the election of directors and on any other matters on which shareholders may vote.

(8) A provision conferring upon shareholders the right to determine the consideration for which shares shall be issued.

(9) A provision requiring the approval of the shareholders (Section 153) or the approval of the outstanding shares (Section 152) for any corporate action, even though not otherwise required by this division.

(10) Provisions eliminating or limiting the personal liability of a director for monetary damages in an action brought by or in the right of the corporation for breach of a director’s duties to the corporation and its shareholders, as set forth in Section 309, provided, however, that (A) such a provision may not eliminate or limit the liability of directors (i) for acts or omissions that involve intentional misconduct or a knowing and culpable violation of law, (ii) for acts or omissions that a
 director believes to be contrary to the best interests of the corporation or its shareholders or that involve the absence of good faith on the part of the director, (iii) for any transaction from which a director derived an improper personal benefit, (iv) for acts or omissions that show a reckless disregard for the director’s duty to the corporation or its shareholders in circumstances in which the director was aware, or should have been aware, in the ordinary course of performing a director’s duties, of a risk of serious injury to the corporation or its shareholders, (v) for acts or omissions that constitute an unexcused pattern of inattention that amounts to an abdication of the director’s duty to the corporation or its shareholders, (vi) under Section 310, or (vii) under Section 316, (B) no such provision shall eliminate or limit the liability of a director for any act or omission occurring prior to the date when the provision becomes effective, and (C) no such provision shall eliminate or limit the
 liability of an officer for any act or omission as an officer, notwithstanding that the officer is also a director or that his or her actions, if negligent or improper, have been ratified by the directors.

(11) A provision authorizing, whether by bylaw, agreement, or otherwise, the indemnification of agents (as defined in Section 317) in excess of that expressly permitted by Section 317 for those agents of the corporation for breach of duty to the corporation and its stockholders, provided, however, that the provision may not provide for indemnification of any agent for any acts or omissions or transactions from which a director may not be relieved of liability as set forth in the exception to paragraph (10) or as to circumstances in which indemnity is expressly prohibited by Section 317.

Notwithstanding this subdivision, in the case of a close corporation any of the provisions referred to above may be
 validly included in a shareholders’ agreement. Notwithstanding this subdivision, bylaws may require for all or any actions by the board the affirmative vote of a majority of the authorized number of directors. Nothing contained in this subdivision shall affect the enforceability, as between the parties thereto, of any lawful agreement not otherwise contrary to public policy.

(b) Reasonable restrictions upon the right to transfer or hypothecate shares of any class or classes or series, but no restriction shall be binding with respect to shares issued prior to the adoption of the restriction unless the holders of such shares voted in favor of the restriction.

(c) The names and addresses of the persons appointed to act as initial directors.

(d) Any other provision, not in conflict with law, for the management of the
 business and for the conduct of the affairs of the corporation, including any provision which is required or permitted by this division to be stated in the bylaws.

(e) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2022.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 889, Sec. 2.   (SB 838)   Effective January 1, 2019.   Section operative January 1, 2022, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

204.5.

(a) If the articles of a corporation include a provision reading substantially as follows: “The liability of the directors of the corporation for monetary damages shall be eliminated to the fullest extent permissible under California law”; the corporation shall be considered to have adopted a provision as authorized by paragraph (10) of subdivision (a) of Section 204 and more specific wording shall not be required.

(b) This section shall not be construed as setting forth the exclusive method of adopting an article provision as authorized by
 paragraph (10) of subdivision (a) of Section 204.

(c) This section shall not change the otherwise applicable standards or duties to make full and fair disclosure to shareholders when approval of such a provision is sought.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 1203, Sec. 1.5.   Effective September 27, 1987.)
-------------------------------------------

205.

Solely for the purpose of any statute or regulation imposing any tax or fee based upon the capitalization of a corporation, all authorized shares of a corporation organized under this division shall be deemed to have a nominal or par value of one dollar ($1) per share. If any federal or other statute or regulation applicable to a particular corporation requires that the shares of such corporation have a par value, such shares shall have the par value determined by the board in order to satisfy the requirements of such statute or regulation.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 682.)
-------------------------------------------

206.

Subject to any limitation contained in the articles and to compliance with any other applicable laws, any corporation other than a corporation subject to the Banking Law or a professional corporation may engage in any business activity; and a corporation subject to the Banking Law or a professional corporation may engage in any business activity not prohibited by the respective statutes and regulations to which it is subject.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1978, Ch. 370.)
-------------------------------------------

207.

Subject to any limitations contained in the articles and to compliance with other provisions of this division and any other applicable laws, a corporation shall have all of the powers of a natural person in carrying out its business activities, including, without limitation, the power to:

(a) Adopt, use, and at will alter a corporate seal, but failure to affix a seal does not affect the validity of any instrument.

(b) Adopt, amend, and repeal bylaws.

(c) Qualify to do business in any other state, territory, dependency, or foreign country.

(d) Subject to the provisions of Section 510, issue,
 purchase, redeem, receive, take or otherwise acquire, own, hold, sell, lend, exchange, transfer or otherwise dispose of, pledge, use, and otherwise deal in and with its own shares, bonds, debentures, and other securities.

(e) Make donations, regardless of specific corporate benefit, for the public welfare or for community fund, hospital, charitable, educational, scientific, civic, or similar purposes.

(f) Pay pensions, and establish and carry out pension, profit-sharing, share bonus, share purchase, share option, savings, thrift, and other retirement, incentive, and benefit plans, trusts, and provisions for any or all of the directors, officers, and employees of the corporation or any of its subsidiary or affiliated corporations, and to indemnify and purchase and maintain insurance on behalf of any fiduciary of such plans, trusts, or provisions.

(g) Subject to the provisions of Section 315, assume obligations, enter into contracts, including contracts of guaranty or suretyship, incur liabilities, borrow and lend money, and otherwise use its credit, and secure any of its obligations, contracts, or liabilities by mortgage, pledge, or other encumbrance of all or any part of its property, franchises, and income.

(h) Participate with others in any partnership, joint venture, or other association, transaction, or arrangement of any kind, whether or not such participation involves sharing or delegation of control with or to others.

(i) (1) In anticipation of or during an emergency, take either or both of the following actions necessary to conduct the corporation’s business operations and affairs, unless emergency bylaws provide otherwise pursuant
 to subdivision (c) of Section 212:

(A) Modify lines of succession to accommodate the incapacity of any director, officer, employee, or agent resulting from the emergency.

(B) Relocate the principal office, designate alternative principal offices or regional offices, or authorize the officers to do so.

(2) During an emergency, take either or both of the following actions necessary to conduct the corporation’s business operations and affairs, unless emergency bylaws provide otherwise pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 212:

(A) Give notice to a director or directors in any practicable manner under the circumstances, including, but not limited to, by publication and radio, when notice of a meeting of the board cannot be given to that director or
 directors in the manner prescribed by the bylaws or Section 307.

(B) Deem that one or more officers of the corporation present at a board meeting is a director, in order of rank and within the same rank in order of seniority, as necessary to achieve a quorum for that meeting.

(3) In anticipation of or during an emergency, the board may take any action that it determines to be necessary or appropriate to respond to the emergency, mitigate the effects of the emergency, or comply with lawful federal and state government orders, but shall not take any action that requires the vote of the shareholders, unless the required vote of the shareholders was obtained prior to the emergency.

(4) Any actions taken in good faith in anticipation of or during an emergency under this subdivision bind the corporation and shall not be
 used to impose liability on a corporate director, officer, employee, or agent.

(5) For purposes of this subdivision, “emergency” means any of the following events or circumstances as a result of which, and only so long as, a quorum of the corporation’s board of directors cannot be readily convened for action:

(A) A natural catastrophe, including, but not limited to, a hurricane, tornado, storm, high water, wind-driven water, tidal wave, tsunami, earthquake, volcanic eruption, landslide, mudslide, snowstorm, drought, epidemic, pandemic, or disease outbreak, or, regardless of cause, any fire, flood, or explosion.

(B) An attack on or within this state or on the public security of its residents by an enemy of this state or on the nation by an enemy of the United States of America, or upon receipt by this state of a
 warning from the federal government indicating that any such enemy attack is probable or imminent.

(C) An act of terrorism or other manmade disaster that results in extraordinary levels of casualties or damage or disruption severely affecting the infrastructure, environment, economy, government functions, or population, including, but not limited to, mass evacuations.

(D) A state of emergency proclaimed by the Governor of this state, including any person serving as Governor in accordance with Section 10 of Article V of the California Constitution and Section 12058 of the Government Code, or by the President of the United States of America.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 523, Sec. 1.   (AB 663)   Effective January 1, 2022.)